Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-19,145
Assets; deposit with State Treasurer; when.

Assets of a dissolved corporation that should be transferred to a creditor, claimant, or member of the corporation who cannot be found or who is not competent to receive them, shall be reduced to cash, subject to known trust restrictions, and deposited with the State Treasurer for safekeeping in accordance with the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act. In the State Treasurer's discretion the property may be received and held in kind. When the creditor, claimant, or member furnishes satisfactory proof of entitlement to the amount deposited or property held in kind, the State Treasurer shall deliver to the creditor, claimant, or member, or his or her representative, that amount or property in accordance with the act.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 145.

Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act, see section 69-1329.